Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-5,184
Boiler Safety Code Advisory Board; created; members; terms.

There is hereby created the Boiler Safety Code Advisory Board. The board shall consist of seven members appointed by the Governor with the approval of the Legislature. Within thirty days after July 9, 1988, the Governor shall appoint three members for terms of two years and four members for terms of four years. Each succeeding member of the board shall be appointed for a term of four years, except that a member appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve for the unexpired term. If the Legislature is not in session when members of the board are appointed, such members shall take office and act as appointees until the next session of the Legislature.

Laws 1988, LB 863, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-739;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 20.